Illinois, session 104th, SB2776.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 246 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)7    Sec. 246. Credit for donations to educational improvement 8organizations for aviation.9    (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 102027, each taxpayer that makes a donation to an educational 11improvement organization for aviation during the taxable year 12may apply to the Department of Commerce and Economic 13Opportunity for a credit against the taxes imposed by 14subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 in an amount not to 15exceed the amount of the taxpayer's donation that is used to 16provide scholarships for prospective pilots, airline and 17aerospace mechanics, and other aviation and aerospace 18professionals as part of a program that operates in this 19State. The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity may 20award no more than $5,000,000 in credits under this Section in 21any calendar year. 22    (b) An educational improvement organization for aviation 23must apply to the Department of Commerce and Economic   SB2776- 2 -LRB104 16444 HLH 29836 b1Opportunity to be eligible to accept donations that qualify 2for a credit under this Section. An application submitted by 3an educational improvement organization for aviation must 4describe its educational program or programs in a form 5prescribed by the Department of Commerce and Economic 6Opportunity by rule. The Department of Commerce and Economic 7Opportunity shall review and approve or disapprove the 8application. 9    (c) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce 10the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 11the credit exceeds the taxpayer's tax liability for the year, 12the excess may be carried forward and applied to the tax 13liability of the 10 taxable years following the excess credit 14year. The tax credit shall be applied to the earliest year for 15which there is a tax liability. If there are credits for more 16than one year that are available to offset a liability, the 17earlier credit shall be applied first. 18    (d) The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity, 19in cooperation with the Department of Revenue, shall adopt 20rules to implement and administer this Section. 21    (e) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 22250.  23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.